Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1542.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 23, chapter 6, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 23-973, to read: START_STATUTE23-973. Coverage; midomafetamine; firefighters; peace officers; post-traumatic stress disorder; annual report; definitions A. Employers shall provide workers' compensation coverage to firefighters and certified peace officers who have been diagnosed with post-traumatic stress disorder by a licensed mental health professional and who have an accepted workers' compensation claim for post-traumatic stress disorder under this title.  If an independent medical examination reveals that a treatment protocol of Midomafetamine is deemed a reasonable and necessary treatment and follows the treatment guidelines established by the commission, workers' compensation coverage may include one complete course of a treatment protocol of Midomafetamine as prescribed by a psychiatrist. B. Midomafetamine prescribed under this section must meet the requirements under title 36, chapter 27 for a controlled substance. C. On or before January 1, 2029 and each January 1 thereafter, the commission shall submit to the joint legislative budget committee a report of the costs of treatment for Midomafetamine under this section for firefighters and certified peace officers. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Certified peace officer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 38-842. 2. "Firefighter" means a professional firefighter who is a member of a city, town, county or fire district fire department. 3. "Licensed mental health professional" means an individual who specializes in trauma and crisis, who uses evidence-based treatment options and who is licensed as either: (a) A psychiatrist pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17. (b) A psychologist pursuant to title 32, chapter 19.1. 4. "Treatment protocol of Midomafetamine" means a process of treatment that has received approval from the United States Food and Drug Administration for post-traumatic stress disorder and that uses Midomafetamine in conjunction with therapy sessions. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 36-2511, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by Laws 2021, chapter 61, section 12, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-2511. Nomenclature The controlled substances listed or to be listed in the schedules in sections 36-2512, 36-2513, 36-2514, 36-2515, 36-2516, and 36-2517 and 36-2517.03 or the rules adopted pursuant to this article are included by whatever official, common, usual, chemical or trade name designated.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 36-2511, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by Laws 2025, chapter 231, section 1, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-2511. Nomenclature The controlled substances listed or to be listed in the schedules in sections 36-2512, 36-2513, 36-2514, 36-2515, 36-2516, 36-2517, and 36-2517.02 and 36-2517.03 or the rules adopted pursuant to this article are included by whatever official, common, usual, chemical or trade name designated. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Title 36, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2517.03, to read: START_STATUTE36-2517.03. United States food and drug administration; approved medication; rescheduling Any compound, mixture or preparation that contains 3, 4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine and that is approved by the United States food and drug administration and rescheduled by the United States drug enforcement administration to a schedule other than schedule I of the controlled substances act (P.L. 91-513; 84 Stat. 1242; 21 United States Code sections 801 through 904) is a controlled substance for the purposes of this chapter and may be prescribed in this state. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Appropriation; department of health services; treatment of post-traumatic stress disorder; midomafetamine; exemption A. The sum of $10,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of health services to award grants pursuant to title 41, chapter 24, Arizona Revised Statutes, for clinical trials, applied clinical research and training of clinicians  in the use of midomafetamine to treat post-traumatic stress disorder and specifically the safe administration of midomafetamine to first responders and veterans who are affected by post-traumatic stress disorder. B. The department may award grants for eligible projects to one or more of the following entities: 1. A sponsor of record or principal investigator that: (a) Has completed at least one late-stage clinical trial relating to the use of midomafetamine to treat post-traumatic stress disorder. (b) Is currently participating in a United States food and drug administration drug review process relating to the use of midomafetamine to treat post-traumatic stress disorder. 2. A public institution of higher education in this state that meets one of the following: (a) Delivers clinical care in the field of mental health or substance use disorders. (b) Provides accredited professional educational or clinical training programs in behavioral health disciplines. (c) Conducts clinical, translational or implementation research related to mental health or substance use disorder treatment. 3. A public institution of higher education in this state described in paragraph 2 of this subsection that serves as the lead institution on behalf of a collaborative partnership or formal consortium formed for the purpose of carrying out an eligible project pursuant to subsection E of this section.  The partnership or consortium shall include the sponsor of record. C. Each application for a grant under this section must identify a sponsor of record that will be responsible for regulatory compliance, product supply and safety oversight for the eligible project. D. The sponsor of record described in subsection B, paragraph 1 of this section may serve as the lead applicant, a co-applicant or a subrecipient.  An entity described in subsection B, paragraph 2 of this section may serve as the lead applicant, and the sponsor of record may be a co-applicant or subrecipient. E. Each eligible project must support at least one of the following objectives: 1. Applied clinical research and clinical trials by conducting practice-oriented research to evaluate and improve models of care, treatment protocols or patient outcomes for the administration of midomafetamine to residents of this state who are impacted by post-traumatic stress disorder, specifically veterans and first responders who are impacted by post-traumatic stress disorder. 2. Clinical training through the design and delivery of evidence-based training programs to prepare health care providers in this state to safely and effectively administer midomafetamine to treat post-traumatic stress disorder, including veterans and first responders. F. For any eligible project involving the administration of midomafetamine or reliance on prior clinical data, the application shall include documentation, which must be issued by the sponsor of record, of both: 1. Product supply sufficient to complete the project. 2. A right of reference or other regulatory authorization, as applicable, to rely on United States food and drug administration submissions relating to midomafetamine. G. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations. Sec. 6. Conditional enactment; notice; industrial commission duties A. Section 23-973, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, does not become effective unless on or before January 1, 2029 the United States food and drug administration approves the use of midomafetamine to treat post-traumatic stress disorder. B. The executive director of the Arizona state board of pharmacy shall notify the director of the Arizona legislative council and the director of the industrial commission of Arizona in writing on or before February 1, 2029 either: 1. Of the date on which the condition was met. 2. That the condition was not met. C. On notification from the Arizona state board of pharmacy that the condition has been met, the industrial commission of Arizona shall assign reimbursement values in its schedule of fees and publish guidelines on billing and reimbursement practices for midomafetamine. Sec. 7. Conditional enactments; notice A. Section 36-2511, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by Laws 2021, chapter 61, section 12 and this act, and section 36-2517.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, do not become effective unless on or before January 1, 2029 a 3, 4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine investigational product is newly approved as a prescription medication pursuant to 21 United States Code section 355 and is controlled under a federal interim final rule issued pursuant to 21 United States Code section 811(j) and published in the Federal Register. B. Section 36-2511, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by Laws 2025, chapter 231, section 1 and this act, does not become effective unless both the condition prescribed by Laws 2025, chapter 231, section 5, subsection A is met and on or before January 1, 2029 a 3, 4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine investigational product is newly approved as a prescription medication pursuant to 21 United States Code section 355 and is controlled under a federal interim final rule issued pursuant to 21 United States Code section 811(j) and published in the Federal Register. C. The executive director of the Arizona state board of pharmacy shall notify in writing the director of the Arizona legislative council on or before February 1, 2029 either: 1. Of the date on which the condition was met. 2. That the condition was not met. Sec. 8. Conditional enactment; notice A. Section 5 this act does not become effective unless on or before January 1, 2027 a midomafetamine investigational product is approved as a prescription medication pursuant to 21 United States Code section 355 and is controlled under a federal interim final rule issued pursuant to 21 United States Code section 811(j) and published in the Federal Register. B. The executive director of the Arizona state board of pharmacy shall notify the director of the Arizona legislative council in writing on or before February 1, 2027 either: 1. Of the date on which the condition was met. 2. That the condition was not met.